District of Columbia statutes.
7-2507.11

Rules.

The Chief, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this unit.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VII, § 712
as added Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-372, § 3(q), 56 DCR 1365
Sept. 29, 2012, D.C. Law 19-170, § 2(q), 59 DCR 5691

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-170 made a technical correction which did not affect this section as codified.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(q) of Firearms Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-651, January 6, 2009, 56 DCR 911).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see § 502 of Crime Bill Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-129, June 29, 2009, 56 DCR 5495).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see § 205 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(q) of Firearms Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-352, May 11, 2012, 59 DCR 5116).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(q) of the Firearms Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-394, July 18, 2012, 59 DCR 8694).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(q) of the Firearms Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-510, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12808).